Massachusetts, session 194th, H3144.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 37 of chapter 62C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 202
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the last sentence of the second paragraph.
SECTION 2. Section 40 of said chapter 62C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out paragraph (a) and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
(a) If any refund of any tax, interest or penalties is made pursuant to sections thirty,
thirty-one A, thirty-six, thirty-six A, thirty-seven or thirty-nine of this chapter, or sections
twenty-seven or twenty-seven A of chapter sixty-five, or section six of chapter sixty-five A, the
state treasurer shall repay to the taxpayer the amount of such refund with interest thereon at the
rate established under subsection (a) of section 32 of this chapter, except as hereinafter provided,
from the date of overpayment to a date, to be determined by the commissioner, preceding the
of 2

date of the refund check by not more than thirty days, whether or not such refund check is
accepted by the taxpayer after tender of such to the taxpayer. The acceptance of such check shall
be without prejudice to any right of the taxpayer to claim any additional overpayment and
interest thereon.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026.
of 2